src/fst/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! Adjective inflection
! --------------------
!! The GERMAN language adjectives compare.

LEXICON A_zweite__adj_ord
+A+Ord: A_zweite_adj_ord-positive ;

LEXICON A_zweite_adj_ord-positive
MSC-PRFPRC_BEAMTER ; !!= * @CODE@ Beamter:beamte

+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>s # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%> # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>s # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>m # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>n # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>n # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>n # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>s # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%> # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>s # ;!mix

+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!st
+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>n # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>n # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>n # ;!
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>r # ;!st
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!st
+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>n # ;!mix

FEM-PRFPRC_ANGESTELLTE ; !!= * @CODE@ see also Angestellte__n_f

+Attr: # ;
+Pred: # ;

LEXICON MSC-PRFPRC_BEAMTER
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>m # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>r # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%> # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>r # ;!mix
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!st
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>n # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>r # ;!st
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!st
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>n # ;!mix

LEXICON FEM-PRFPRC_ANGESTELLTE
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%> # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%> # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>r # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>r # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%> # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%> # ;!

+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!st
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>n # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>n # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>n # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>r # ;!st
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>n # ;!mix
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%> # ;!st
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>n # ;!sw
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>n # ;!mix


LEXICON A_nipt__adj
+A: #;

LEXICON A_abendfüllend__adj
! CHECKME, why is there a separated contlex abendfüllend__adj-positive?
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;

LEXICON A_abenteuerlich__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A: A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp ;
+A: A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;
LEXICON A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>em # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!sw
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>er # ;!mix

!+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
!+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
!+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
!+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!
!+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
!+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
!+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
!+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
!+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!mix

+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>es # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>e # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>es # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>em # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>es # ;!st
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!sw
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>es # ;!mix

!+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
!+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
!+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
!+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!
!+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
!+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
!+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
!+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
!+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!mix

+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>e # ;!

!+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
!+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
!+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
!+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!
!+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
!+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
!+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
!+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
!+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>en # ;!sw
!+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!mix

+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
+Pl+Acc+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
+Pl+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>en # ;!
+Pl+Dat+Def:%>en # ;!
+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!st
+Pl+Gen+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!mix
+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!st
+Pl+Nom+Def:%>en # ;!sw
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!mix

+Attr: # ;
+Pred: # ;


LEXICON A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp
+Comp:%>er A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ; ! -comp_01 not needed
LEXICON A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp_01
+Attr:%> # ;!
+Pred:%> # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>en # ;!Acc
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>em # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>er # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>en # ;!Gen

+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;!Dat
+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!

+Fem+Sg:%>e # ;!Acc
+Fem+Sg:%>e # ;!Nom
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>e # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>em # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;!Dat
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>en # ;!Gen
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>es # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>es # ;!

LEXICON A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup
+Superl:%>st A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;!-sup_01 not needed
LEXICON A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup_01
+Pred:%>en # ;!
+Pred:%> # ;!
+Attr:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>em # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>em # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;!Dat
+Fem+Pl+Dat:%>en # ;!Dat
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Acc:%>en # ;!Acc
+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>en # ;!Gen
+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>en # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>en # ;!Gen
+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef+NoArt:%>er # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>er # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>es # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>es # ;!
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>e # ;!Acc
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>e # ;!Nom
+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef+NoArt:%>e # ;!
+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>e # ;!
+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>e # ;!


LEXICON A_abhold__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A:  A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp ;
+A:  A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;
+A:%>e  A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;


LEXICON A_abgebrannt__adj
+A+Pos: A_abenteuerlich__adj-positive ;
+A:  A_abenteuerlich__adj-comp ;
+A:%>e  A_abenteuerlich__adj-sup ;
