src/fst/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
erste:erste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zweite:zweite A_zweite__adj_ord ;
dritte:dritte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
vierte:vierte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
fünfte:fünfte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
sechste:sechste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
siebte:siebte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
achte:achte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
neunte:neunte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zehnte:zehnte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zwölfte:zwölfte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
vierzehnte:vierzehnte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
sechzehnte:sechzehnte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
achtzehnte:achtzehnte A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zwanzigste:zwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
zweiundzwanzigste:zweiundzwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
vierundzwanzigste:vierundzwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
sechsundzwanzigste:sechsundzwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
achtundzwanzigste:achtundzwanzigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
dreißigste:dreißigste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
Hundertste:Hundertste A_zweite__adj_ord ;
ander:ander A_nipt__adj ;
alliiert:alliiert A_abendfüllend__adj ;
amüsant:amüsant A_abgebrannt__adj ;
anstehend:anstehend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
arisch:arisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
aufgeräumt:aufgeräumt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
baufällig:baufällig A_abhold__adj ;
begehrt:begehrt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
begeisternd:begeisternd A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
beschädigt:beschädigt A_abendfüllend__adj ;
besonder:besonder A_abgebrannt__adj ;
bleich:bleich A_abgebrannt__adj ;
bündig:bündig A_abhold__adj ;
charmant:charmant A_abgebrannt__adj ;
depressiv:depressiv A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
dutzend:dutzend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
eilig:eilig A_abhold__adj ;
empirisch:empirisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
erbarmungslos:erbarmungslos A_abgebrannt__adj ;
essentiell:essentiell A_abendfüllend__adj ;
faktisch:faktisch A_abhold__adj ;
fremd:fremd A_abgebrannt__adj ;
fröhlich:fröhlich A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
frostig:frostig A_abhold__adj ;
gebührenfrei:gebührenfrei A_abendfüllend__adj ;
gering:gering A_abhold__adj ;
geübt:geübt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
gleichaltrig:gleichaltrig A_abendfüllend__adj ;
grausig:grausig A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
häufig:häufig A_abhold__adj ;
hügelig:hügelig A_abhold__adj ;
idyllisch:idyllisch A_abendfüllend__adj ;
imposant:imposant A_abgebrannt__adj ;
impulsiv:impulsiv A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
kategorisch:kategorisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
köpfig:köpfig A_abendfüllend__adj ;
krass:krass A_abgebrannt__adj ;
kritisch:kritisch A_abhold__adj ;
lateinisch:lateinisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
leidlich:leidlich A_abhold__adj ;
makellos:makellos A_abendfüllend__adj ;
metallisch:metallisch A_abhold__adj ;
mies:mies A_abgebrannt__adj ;
montenegrinisch:montenegrinisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
naheliegend:naheliegend A_abhold__adj ;
neuralgisch:neuralgisch A_abendfüllend__adj ;
offenbar:offenbar A_abhold__adj ;
pädagogisch:pädagogisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
postwendend:postwendend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
prägnant:prägnant A_abgebrannt__adj ;
punktuell:punktuell A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
rabiat:rabiat A_abhold__adj ;
roh:roh A_abgebrannt__adj ;
rüstig:rüstig A_abhold__adj ;
sauber:sauber A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
schlaflos:schlaflos A_abendfüllend__adj ;
schwammig:schwammig A_abhold__adj ;
seicht:seicht A_abgebrannt__adj ;
slowakisch:slowakisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
ständig:ständig A_abendfüllend__adj ;
still:still A_abhold__adj ;
süffig:süffig A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
tadellos:tadellos A_abgebrannt__adj ;
treuherzig:treuherzig A_abhold__adj ;
triumphal:triumphal A_abendfüllend__adj ;
typisch:typisch A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
unbetont:unbetont A_abgebrannt__adj ;
ungefährdet:ungefährdet A_abendfüllend__adj ;
unverschämt:unverschämt A_abhold__adj ;
unversucht:unversucht A_abendfüllend__adj ;
unvoreingenommen:unvoreingenommen A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
verdammt:verdammt A_abgebrannt__adj ;
verloren:verloren A_abendfüllend__adj ;
verziert:verziert A_abgebrannt__adj ;
vielfältig:vielfältig A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
vorübergehend:vorübergehend A_abendfüllend__adj ;
wahrscheinlich:wahrscheinlich A_abhold__adj ;
willig:willig A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
zeitgemäß:zeitgemäß A_abgebrannt__adj ;
ziellos:ziellos A_abendfüllend__adj ;
zuversichtlich:zuversichtlich A_abenteuerlich__adj ;
